Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 59 COLORADO MUNICIPAL BOND SUPERVISION ACT
11-59-117. Judicial review of orders.

Any person claiming to be aggrieved by a final order of the securities commissioner, including a refusal to issue an order, may obtain judicial review thereof, and the securities commissioner may obtain an order of court for its enforcement in a proceeding as provided in this section.

Such proceeding shall be brought in the court of appeals by appropriate proceedings under section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S.

Such proceeding shall be initiated by the filing of a petition in the court of appeals and the service of a copy thereof upon the securities commissioner and upon all parties who appeared before the securities commissioner, and thereafter such proceeding shall be processed under the Colorado appellate rules. The court of appeals shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding and the questions determined therein and shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it deems just and proper and to make and enter upon the pleadings, testimony, and proceedings set forth in such transcript an order enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as so modified or setting aside the order of the securities commissioner in whole or in part.

An objection that has not been urged before the securities commissioner shall not be considered by the court, unless the failure or neglect to urge such objection shall be excused because of extraordinary circumstances.

The findings of the securities commissioner as to the facts shall be conclusive if supported by substantial evidence.

The jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive, and its judgment and order shall be final, subject to review as provided by law and the Colorado appellate rules.

The commencement of proceedings under subsection (1) of this section does not, unless specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the securities commissioner's order.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 2420, § 1, effective January 1, 1992.

11-59-118. Interpretation and interpretive opinions.

The provisions and rules of this article shall be coordinated with the provisions and rules of article 51 of this title to the extent that such coordination is consistent with both the purposes and provisions of this article.

The securities commissioner may, in such commissioner's discretion, honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions regarding any provision of this article or any rule or order under this article. Any person making such a request shall pay an opinion fee, which shall be determined and collected pursuant to section 11-59-119 and which shall not be refundable. In response to any request for an interpretive opinion received under this section, the securities commissioner may waive any condition imposed under this article as it applies to the person making such request.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 2421, § 1, effective January 1, 1992.

11-59-119. Collection of fees - division of securities cash fund.

A fee payable under this article shall be deemed paid when the securities commissioner receives the payment.

The securities commissioner shall transmit all fees collected under this article to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the division of securities cash fund created by section 11-51-707. Moneys credited to the division of securities cash fund shall be used as provided in this section and in section 11-51-707 and shall not be deposited in or transferred to the general fund of this state or any other fund.

The securities commissioner shall set the amount of each fee which the securities commissioner is authorized by law to collect under this article. In the discretion of the commissioner, the securities commissioner may set application for registration or amendment fees payable under section 11-59-104 by establishing a basic filing fee up to a maximum of five hundred dollars, plus a scale of rates applied to the dollar amount of bonds to be registered, not to exceed five dollars per ten thousand dollars, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars based on the dollar amount of bonds to be issued. The securities commissioner may set the exemption fee payable under section 11-59-110 up to a maximum of one hundred dollars. Such fees for a fiscal year may be adjusted by the securities commissioner no more often than twice during that fiscal year.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 2422, § 1, effective January 1, 1992.

11-59-120. Effective date.

The rule-making authority of the securities commissioner and the provisions of section 11-59-104 (1) take effect July 1, 1991, and, unless otherwise provided, all other provisions of this article 59 take effect January 1, 1992.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 2422, § 1, effective January 1, 1992.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-142), ch. 102, p. 481, § 2, effective August 10.